Utah statutes.
72-10-602.   Criminal background check authorized -- Written notice
required.
(1)  A city may by ordinance require a ground transportation service provider
to submit to a criminal background check as a condition of providing ground
transportation service to an airport under the city's authority.
(2) (a)  Each ground transportation service provider, if required to submit a
background check under Subsection (1), shall:
(i)  submit a fingerprint card in a form acceptable to the division; and
(ii)  consent to a fingerprint background check by:
(A)  the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification; and
(B)  the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(b)  If requested by a city that has adopted an ordinance in accordance with
Subsection (1), the division shall request the Department of Public Safety to
complete a Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal background check through a
national criminal history system for each background check requested by a city
under this section.
(c) (i)  If a city has adopted an ordinance in accordance with Subsection (1),
the city may make a ground transportation service provider's access to provide
ground transportation service to an airport conditional pending completion of
a criminal background check under this section.
(ii)  If a criminal background check discloses that a ground transportation
service provider failed to disclose accurately a criminal history, the city
may deny or, if conditionally given, immediately terminate the ground
transportation service provider's right to provide ground transportation
service to an airport.
(iii)  If a ground transportation service provider accurately disclosed the
relevant criminal history and the criminal background check discloses that the
ground transportation service provider has been convicted of a crime that
indicates a potential risk for the safety or well-being of the patrons or
employees of the airport under the city's authority, the city may deny or, if
conditionally given, immediately terminate the ground transportation service
provider's right to provide ground transportation service to an airport.
(3)  Each city that requests a criminal background check under Subsection (1)
shall prepare criteria for which criminal activity will preclude ground
transportation service to the airport and shall provide written notice to the
ground transportation service provider who is the subject of the criminal
background check that the background check has been requested.
(4)  The legislative body of a city may by a majority vote of its members
overrule a decision made by the mayor or a city employee establishing the
criteria for precluding the right of a ground transportation service provider
under Subsection (3).
